test/src/morphology/dicttests_dict-gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# Tag tests:
  G3 - vuorru:
    vuorru+G3+N+Sg+Gen: vuorru

  G7 - gálli:
    gálli+G7+N+Sg+Gen: gálli

  NomAg - nubbijođiheaddji:
    nubbijođiheaddji+N+NomAg+Sg+Gen: nubbijođiheaddji

  v1 - rekruterenoassi:
    rekruterenoassi+v1+N+Sg+Gen: rekruterenoasi

  v2 - servodatfágalinjá:
    servodatfágalinjá+v2+N+Sg+Gen: servvodatfágalinjá

  v3 - lohkanlistu:
    lohkanlistu+v3+N+Sg+Gen: lohkanlisttá

  v4 - servodatvásihus:
    servodatvásihus+v4+N+Sg+Gen: servvodatvásihusa

  v5 - sihkkelkursa:
    sihkkelkursa+v5+N+Sg+Gen: syhkkelgurssa

  v6 - eanahálddašanláhka:
    eanahálddašanláhka+v6+N+Sg+Gen: eatnanhálddahanlága

  v7 - eahkediskursa:
    eahkediskursa+v7+N+Sg+Gen: eahketkurssa

  v8 - diibmolistu:
    diibmolistu+v8+N+Sg+Gen: tiibmalistta

# Sem tags only after Prop:

# Sem tags only after Prop:
  Sem/Sur - Risten:
    Risten+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Risten

  Sem/Plc - Romsa:
    Romsa+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Romssa

  Sem/Hum - ipmil: # No tag here:
    ipmil+N+Sg+Gen: ipmil

# Spell relax tests:
  eth - diehtit:
    diehtit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: dieðe
